nb: Røkelsesduft: Sitrus; Røkelse; Urteblandinger; Jasmine; Lavendel; Myrra; Nag champa; Patchouli; Rose; Sandeltre; Vanilje; Annet
pt-PT: Fragrância de incenso: Citrinos; Olíbano; Misturas de ervas; Jasmim; Lavanda; Mirra; Nag Champa; Patchouli; Rosa; Sândalo; Baunilha; Outro
el: Άρωμα θυμιάματος: Εσπεριδοειδές; Λιβάνι; Μείγματα βοτάνων; Γιασεμί; Λεβάντα; Σμύρνα; Nag champa; Πατσουλί; Τριαντάφυλλο; Σανταλόξυλο; Βανίλια; Άλλο
es: Fragancia de incienso: Cítricos; Incienso; Mezclas de hierbas; Jazmín; Lavanda; Mirra; Nag Champa; Pachuli; Rosa; Sándalo; Vainilla; Otros
ru: Аромат благовония: Цитрусы; Ладан; Травяные смеси; Жасмин; Лаванда; Мирра; Наг чампа; Пачули; Роза; Сандал; Ваниль; Другой
da: Røgelsesduft: Citrus; Frankincense; Urteblandinger; Jasmin; Lavendel; Myrra; Nag champa; Patchouli; Rose; Sandeltræ; Vanilje; Andet
tr: Tütsü kokusu: Narenciye; Buhur; Bitkisel karışımlar; Yasemin; Lavanta; Mür; Nag champa; Paçuli; Gül; Sandal ağacı; Vanilya; Diğer
pt-BR: Fragrância do incenso: Citrus; Olíbano; Mix de ervas; Jasmim; Lavanda; Mirra; Nag champa; Patchouli; Rosa; Sândalo; Baunilha; Outro
bg-BG: Аромат на тамян: Цитрус; Тамян; Билкови смеси; Жасмин; Лавандула; Смирна; Наг чампа; Пачули; Роза; Сандалово дърво; Ванилия; Други
vi: Mùi khói thơm: Cam quýt; Hương trầm; Hỗn hợp thảo mộc; Hoa nhài; Hoa oải hương; Nhựa thơm; Nag Champa; Quảng hoắc hương; Hình hoa hồng; Gỗ đàn hương; Vani; Khác
pl: Zapach kadzidła: Cytrus; Olibanum; Mieszanki ziołowe; Jaśmin; Lawenda; Mirra; Nag champa; Brodziec paczułka; Róża; Sandałowiec; Wanilia; Inne
ko: 인센스 향: 시트러스; 유향; 허브 블렌드; 자스민; 라벤더; 몰약; 나그 참파; 파출리; 장미; 백단향; 바닐라; 기타
it: Fragranza dell’incenso: Agrumi; Incenso; Miscele di erbe; Gelsomino; Lavanda; Mirra; Nag champa; Patchouli; Rosa; Sandalo; Vaniglia; Altro
en: Incense fragrance: Citrus; Frankincense; Herbal blends; Jasmine; Lavender; Myrrh; Nag champa; Patchouli; Rose; Sandalwood; Vanilla; Other
lt-LT: Smilkalų kvapas: Citrusiniai vaisiai; Smilkalai; Žolelių mišiniai; Jazminai; Levandos; Mira; Nag champa; Pačiuliai; Rožės; Sandalmedis; Vanilė; Kita
nl: Wierookgeur: Citrus; Wierook; Kruidenmix; Jasmijn; Lavendel; Mirre; Nag Champa; Patchouli; Rozenrood; Sandelhout; Vanille; Andere
ja: お香の香り: シトラス; フランキンセンス; ハーブブレンド; ジャスミン; ラベンダー; ミルラ; ナグチャンパ; パチョリ; ローズ; サンダルウッド; バニラ; その他
hu: Füstölő illata: Citrus; Fenyőtömjén; Gyógynövény-keverékek; Jázmin; Levendula; Mirha; Nag champa; Pacsuli; Rózsa; Szantálfa; Vanília; Egyéb
sk-SK: Vôňa kadidla: Citrus; Kadidlo; Bylinné zmesi; Jazmín; Levanduľa; Myrha; Nag champa; Pačuli; Ruža; Santalové drevo; Vanilka; Iné
ro-RO: Parfum produse cu tămâie: Citrice; Tămâie; Amestec de plante; Iasomie; Lavandă; Smirnă; Nag champa; Paciuli; Trandafir; Lemn de santal; Vanilie; Altele
fi: Suitsukkeen tuoksu: Sitrus; Suitsuke; Yrttisekoitus; Jasmiini; Laventeli; Mirha; Nag champa; Patsuli; Ruusu; Santelipuu; Vanilja; Muu
zh-CN: 熏香: 柑橘类; 乳香; 草本混合物; 茉莉; 薰衣草; 没药; 黄花; 广藿香; 玫瑰型; 檀香油; 香草; 其他
zh-TW: 香燭香氣: 柑橘類; 乳香; 草本混合; 茉莉花; 薰衣草; 沒藥; 木線香; 廣藿香; 玫瑰; 檀香; 香草; 其他
fr: Parfum d’encens: Agrume; Oliban; Mélange de plantes; Jasmin; Lavande; Myrrhe; Nag Champa; Patchouli; Pomme; Santal; Vanille; Autre
th: กลิ่นหอมธูป: ซิตรัส; กำยาน; ผสมผสานสมุนไพร; มะลิ; ลาเวนเดอร์; มดยอบ; นาคจำปา; พิมเสน; กุหลาบ; ไม้จันทน์หอม; วานิลลา; อื่นๆ
cs: Vůně kadidla: Citrus; Kadidlo; Směsi bylin; Jasmín; Levandule; Myrha; Nag champa; Pačuli; Růžice; Santalové dřevo; Vanilka; Jiné
de: Duft des Räucherstoffs: Zitrus; Weihrauch; Kräutermischungen; Jasmin; Lavendel; Myrrhe; Nag Champa; Patchouli; Rose; Sandelholz; Vanille; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vonj kadila: Citrus; Kadilo; Zeliščne mešanice; Jasmin; Sivka; Mira; Nag champa; Pačuli; Vrtnica; Sandalovina; Vanilija; Drugo
hr-HR: Miris mirisnog štapića: Citrus; Tamjan; Biljne mješavine; Jasmin; Lavanda; Smirna; Nag Champa; Pačuli; Ruža; Sandalovina; Vanilija; Ostalo
sv: Doft av rökelse: Citrus; Rökelse; Örtblandningar; Jasmine; Lavender; Myrra; Nag champa; Patchouli; Rosfärgad; Sandelträ; Vanilj; Övrigt